California statutes. Education Code
(d) Nothing in this article shall limit or supersede any other requirement of law imposing a paper recycling program on school districts or the California State University and Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 184.)
-------------------------------------------

32373.

(a) Each educational agency is encouraged to purchase recycled paper if the supplier of recycled paper offers the paper at a cost which does not exceed by more than 5 percent the lowest offer of nonrecycled paper of comparable quality.

(b) Whenever an educational agency purchases recycled paper, the educational agency shall purchase the paper with the highest percentage of postconsumer waste, if the price and quality of the recycled paper are otherwise equal.

(c) Whenever it is practical to do so, each educational agency shall revise its procurement specifications to eliminate discrimination against recycled paper and to give preference to the purchase of recycled paper.

(d) Each educational agency shall make all reasonable efforts to eliminate the purchase of paper and paper products which are deemed potential contaminants of the educational agency’s paper recycling program.

(e) When contracting with any educational agency for the sale of a paper product, the contractor shall certify in writing to the contracting officer or the officer’s representative the percentage of secondary and postconsumer waste in the paper product and whether or not such percentages meet the minimum percentages specified in subdivision (d) of Section 32371. Such certification shall be furnished under penalty of perjury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 885.)
-------------------------------------------

32375.

The State Solid Waste Management Board, in conjunction with the Department of Education and other state agencies which the board and the Department of Education deem appropriate in order to carry out the purposes of this article, shall coordinate the implementation of this article and shall provide materials, technical assistance, and other resources as it deems necessary to aid and encourage educational agencies to establish paper recycling programs.

The State Solid Waste Management Board may enter into agreements with other agencies for the purpose of the administration and implementation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 885.)
-------------------------------------------

32376.

The State Solid Waste Management Board, in conjunction with the Department of Education and other agencies which the board and the Department of Education deem to be appropriate in order to carry out the purposes of this article, shall develop and distribute curriculum material relating to paper recycling, conservation of resources, and topics relating to the implementation of the program established by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 885.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Prohibited Activities [32380. - 32385.]

32380.

As used in this article:

(a) “Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, firm, or public board, agency, or entity.

(b) “Prepare” means to put into condition for intended use.

(c) “Degree” means any “academic degree” or “honorary degree” or title of any designation, mark, appellation, series of letters or words such as, but not limited to, associate, bachelor, master, doctor, or fellow which signifies, purports, or is generally taken to signify satisfactory completion of the requirements of an academic, educational, technological, or professional program of study or is an honorary title conferred for recognition of some meritorious achievement.

(d) “Diploma” means any diploma, certificate, transcript, document, or other writing in any language other than a degree representing that an individual has completed any course of study.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

32381.

Any person who prepares, manufactures, or prints, or who offers to prepare, manufacture, or print, for a fee or other compensation, any document purporting to be a degree or diploma without written authorization to do so from the school authority shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. As used in this section, “school authority” means any of the following:

(a) A governing board of a school district that issued or reissued the degree or diploma, as the case may be.

(b) A private school that issued or reissued the degree or diploma, as the case may be.

(c) Any public or private college, university, or other institution of higher learning that issued or reissued the degree or diploma, as the case may be.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person from reproducing, or having reproduced, for his personal use a degree or diploma issued to him by a school authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

32382.

No person shall:

(a) Sell, barter, offer to sell or barter, or conspire to sell or barter, any diploma or degree as defined in this article.

(b) Buy, obtain by barter, attempt to buy or obtain by barter, or conspire to obtain by barter or buy, any diploma or degree.

(c) Use in connection with any business, trade, profession, or occupation, or attempt to use in connection with any business, trade, profession or occupation, or conspire to use in connection with any business, trade, profession or occupation, any degree or diploma, which has been purchased, obtained by barter, fraudulently or illegally issued, illegally obtained, counterfeited, materially altered, or found.

(d) Use in connection with a business, trade, profession, or occupation, or give or receive, any degree or diploma which has been purchased, obtained by barter, fraudulently or illegally issued, illegally obtained, counterfeited, materially altered, or found.

(e) Attempt to use in connection with a business, trade, profession, or occupation, or attempt to give or receive, any degree or diploma, which has been purchased, obtained by barter, fraudulently or illegally issued, illegally obtained, counterfeited, materially altered, or found.

(f) Conspire to use in connection with a business, trade, profession, or occupation, or conspire to give or receive, any diploma or degree evidencing the undertaking or completion of any course of study or scholastic achievement attained if, in fact, such course of study has not been undertaken nor completed or if such scholastic achievement has not been attained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

32383.

Any person willfully violating any provision of Section 32382 is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

32384.

Any court of competent jurisdiction is hereby authorized to grant such relief as is necessary to enforce the provisions of this article, including the issuance of an injunction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

32385.

Actions for injunction under the provisions of this article may be brought in the name of the people of the State of California upon their own complaint or upon the complaint of any person, or in the name of any authorized public or private school, college, university, or other authorized institution of learning, acting on its own behalf or the general public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Fingerprinting [32390. - 32390.]

32390.

(a) The governing board of any school district may offer a fingerprint program for children enrolled in kindergarten or newly enrolled in that district. The governing board may contract with any public or private agency, including any civic or community organization if determined to be appropriate by the governing board, to perform the fingerprinting. The governing board may seek to obtain private funding and volunteer assistance in performing the fingerprinting. The department shall adopt rules and regulations concerning obtaining private funding and volunteer assistance, and develop fingerprinting standards, as approved by the Department of Justice, to be followed in the fingerprinting of children pursuant to this article.

The governing board of any school district offering a fingerprinting program pursuant to this article shall assess a fee to the parent or guardian of the fingerprinted pupils. The fee shall be calculated to reimburse the district only for actual costs associated with the program.

(b) In a school district which elects to offer a fingerprinting program pursuant to this article, each parent or guardian of a child shall be informed of the school fingerprinting program when he or she first enrolls the child in the public schools. At that time the parent or guardian shall declare, in writing, whether or not he or she wants the child to be fingerprinted in the school program and if the parent or guardian consents to the fingerprinting he or she shall pay the applicable fee. The parent or guardian shall be informed in writing at the time of enrollment that he or she may reverse in writing his or her declaration on fingerprinting at any time. Children shall not be fingerprinted without the consent of the parent or guardian.

(c) Any report or document containing fingerprints of a child which is made pursuant to this article shall be given to the parents or guardian of the child and shall not be given to, or retained by, the school district or any other private or public entity. The report or document containing the fingerprints may be given to the parents or guardian with the child’s report card or any other document routinely mailed to parents or guardians, or may be given to parents or guardians in person at any conference with the child’s teacher. To the maximum extent feasible, the report or document containing the fingerprints shall not be sent to the parents in a separate mailing.

(d) As used in this article, the terms “school district,” and “governing board” include a county superintendent of schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 134, Sec. 4.   Effective July 7, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Educational Services and the Federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 [32400. - 32401.]

32400.

(a) The Legislature finds that as many as one million seven hundred thousand people could be granted amnesty and would seek permanent residency in California under the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603). Under the act, eligible individuals would be required to demonstrate an understanding of ordinary English and a knowledge and understanding of the history and government of the United States.

(b) Further, it is the intent of the Legislature to establish a state test for use by eligible individuals that would attest to their understanding of English and understanding of the history and government of the United States to meet the requirements of Section
 312 of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1423) and the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 69, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 14.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Superseded by amendment by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2016, Ch. 69, only if it becomes operative on or before January 20, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

32400.

(a) The Legislature finds that as many as one million seven hundred thousand undocumented foreign nationals could be granted amnesty and would seek permanent residency in California under the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603). Under the act, eligible undocumented foreign nationals would be required to demonstrate an understanding of ordinary English and a knowledge and understanding of the history and government of the United States.

(b) Further, it is the intent of the Legislature to establish a state test for use by eligible foreign nationals that would attest to their understanding of English and understanding of the history and government of the United States to meet the requirements of Section 312 of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1423) and the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 69, Sec. 3.   (AB 1850)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative only if the condition in Sec. 10 of Ch. 69 is satisfied on or before January 20, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

32401.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in consultation with the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, shall develop a test or adopt an existing test, subject to the approval of the United States Attorney General pursuant to the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603), to measure whether an eligible person has a minimal understanding of ordinary English and a knowledge and understanding of the history and government of the United States as required under Section 312 of the Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1423).

(b) The Governor, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Chancellor
 of the California Community Colleges, the President pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the Assembly shall petition the Director of the Immigration and Naturalization Service and the United States Attorney General for approval to use the test referred to in subdivision (a) as one means by which an eligible immigrant may satisfy the requirements under the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603).

(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall distribute this test to school districts, county offices of education, and community colleges, upon their request for purposes of administration, to eligible immigrants granted legal status pursuant to Section 245A of the Immigration and Nationality Act, as amended by the Federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603). Any school
 district, county office of education, or any other eligible agency which receives federal legalization impact-assistance funds to provide educational services may administer the test for purposes of determining the need of an eligible immigrant applying for legal status for appropriate educational services, and of allowing an eligible immigrant to demonstrate an understanding of ordinary English and a knowledge and understanding of the history and government of the United States. Test results shall be confidential and may not be released without the written consent of the eligible immigrant for any purpose that is not directly related to the provision of educational services. Upon request by an eligible immigrant applying for legal status, test results may be transmitted to the Immigration and Naturalization Service. School districts, county offices of education, community colleges, and any other
 eligible agencies that receive federal funds for this purpose shall administer the test using appropriate test monitor and control procedures and provide for necessary test security measures.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1491, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 15.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Superseded by amendment by Stats. 2016, Ch. 69, only if it becomes operative on or before January 20, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

32401.

(a) The Superintendent, in consultation with the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, shall develop a test or adopt an existing test, subject to the approval of the United States Attorney General pursuant to the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603), to measure whether an eligible foreign national has a minimal understanding of ordinary English and a knowledge and understanding of the history and government of the United States as required under Section 312 of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1423).

(b) The Governor, the Superintendent, the Chancellor of the California
 Community Colleges, the President pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the Assembly shall petition the Director of the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service and the United States Attorney General for approval to use the test referred to in subdivision (a) as one means by which an eligible foreign national may satisfy the requirements under the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-603).

(c) The Superintendent shall distribute the test referred to in subdivision (a) to school districts, county offices of education, and community colleges, upon their request for purposes of administration, to eligible foreign nationals granted legal status pursuant to Section 245A of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act, as amended by the Federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (Public Law
 99-603). Any school district, county office of education, or any other eligible agency that receives federal legalization impact-assistance funds to provide educational services may administer the test for purposes of determining the need of an eligible foreign national applying for legal status for appropriate educational services, and of allowing an eligible foreign national to demonstrate an understanding of ordinary English and a knowledge and understanding of the history and government of the United States. Test results shall be confidential, and shall not be released without the written consent of the eligible foreign national for any purpose that is not directly related to the provision of educational services. Upon request by an eligible foreign national applying for legal status, test results may be transmitted to the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service. School
 districts, county offices of education, community colleges, and any other eligible agencies that receive federal funds for this purpose shall administer the test using appropriate test monitor and control procedures and provide for necessary test security measures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 69, Sec. 4.   (AB 1850)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative only if the condition in Sec. 10 of Ch. 69 is satisfied on or before January 20, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Excludable Restitution Payments [32425. - 32425.]

32425.

To the extent permitted by federal law, excludable restitution payments, as defined in Section 17131.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and excludable settlement payments, as defined in Section 17131.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, are not included in the income or resources of an individual who is eligible for the exclusion under Section 17131.1 or 17131.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for determining eligibility for any grant, enrollment, or priority for services in any program under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Prohibited Uses of Public Funds [32435. - 32435.]

32435.

(a) No school district, county board of education, or county superintendent of schools shall expend any public funds on the purchase of alcoholic beverages.

(b) If an employee of a school district or county educational agency requests and is erroneously granted a reimbursement for the purchase of alcoholic beverages in violation of subdivision (a) of this section, the employee may refund the reimbursement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 993, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Adult Day Care Food Program [32450. - 32454.]

32450.

The State Department of Education shall, on behalf of the state, participate in the federal Adult Day Care Food Program as set forth in subsection (o) of Section 1766 of Title 42 of the United States Code, and shall not terminate its participation in the program unless the Legislature authorizes that termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 530, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32451.

The State Department of Education is hereby designated as the single state agency to administer the Adult Day Care Food Program established pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 530, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32452.

For the purposes of this chapter, adult day care centers, as defined in Section 32543, are eligible for reimbursement for meals or supplements served to persons 60 years of age or older or to chronically impaired disabled persons, including victims of Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders with neurological and organic brain dysfunction, provided the adult day care centers meet the following requirements:

(a) Reimbursement provided to those institutions for those purposes shall be supplemental to all other state and federal funding and improve the quality of meals or level of services provided or increase participation in the program.

(b) Lunches shall provide, on the average, approximately one-third of the daily recommended dietary allowance established by the Food and Nutrition Board of the National Research Council of the National Academy of Sciences.

(c) The adult day care center makes reasonable efforts to serve meals that meet the special dietary requirements of participants, including efforts to serve foods in forms that are palatable to participants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 530, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32453.

The State Department of Education shall administer the Adult Day Care Food Program for all eligible, participating adult day care centers that provide adult day care services to the persons described in Section 32452. For the purposes of this chapter, “adult day care center” means any public agency or private nonprofit organization, or any proprietary Title XIX center or Title XX center that meets the following requirements:

(a) The center is licensed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1570) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, or otherwise approved to operate by a state or federal agency.

(b) The center provides for care and services directly or under arrangements under which the public agency, nonprofit organization, or proprietary Title XIX or Title XX center maintains professional management responsibility for all of the services.

The terms “proprietary Title XIX” or “proprietary Title XX center” means any private, for-profit center that provides adult day care services for which it receives compensation from amounts granted to the states pursuant to Title XIX or XX of the federal Social Security Act as set forth in Section 1396 and following of Title 42 of the United States Code and for which not less than 25 percent of the enrolled eligible participants were served by the center in the calendar month preceding initial application or annual reapplication for program participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 530, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

32454.

The State Department of Education shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary for the administration of this chapter in a manner consistent with Section 1766 of Title 42 of the United States Code and any federal regulations adopted thereto, including, but not limited to, regulations setting forth eligibility requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 530, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 19.5. EDUCATION IN STATE PRISONS [32500. - 32500.]

32500.

(a) In order to encourage greater involvement of educational institutions in planning and developing prison-based educational programs, the Director of Corrections, the Chancellor of the California State University and Colleges, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction, with the advice of the California Postsecondary Education Commission, shall enter into interagency agreements. Such agreements shall provide for, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A determination of the roles of the Department of Corrections, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University and Colleges, the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the Department of Education, in developing policy for prison-based educational programs.

(2) Joint policy and program planning.

(b) The Director of Corrections, the Chancellor of the California State University and Colleges, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall appoint an advisory committee to do, but not be limited to doing, all of the following:

(1) Making recommendations on the use of instructional television in these programs.

(2) Reviewing and making recommendations relating to any proposed budgets for these programs.

(3) Reviewing and making recommendations relating to the implementation of the interagency agreement.

(c) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the Director of Corrections shall administer all prison-based education programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1037, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 19.6. Covid-19 Emergency Appropriations for Education [32525. - 32527.]

32525.

(a) The Learning Recovery Emergency Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury for the purpose of receiving appropriations for school districts, county offices of education, charter schools, and community college districts related to the state of emergency declared by the Governor on March 4, 2020, relating to the COVID-19 pandemic.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 41207.5, moneys transferred to the Learning Recovery Emergency Fund pursuant to Section 32526 that would otherwise revert to the Proposition 98 Reversion Account shall instead remain in the Learning Recovery Emergency Fund for future reallocation to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools consistent with the intent of Section
 32526.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 53, Sec. 2.   (AB 182)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

32526.

(a) (1) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, the sum of six billion three hundred forty-five million four hundred five thousand dollars ($6,345,405,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for transfer to the Learning Recovery Emergency Fund created in Section 32525. The Superintendent shall allocate available moneys in the Learning Recovery Emergency Fund deposited pursuant to this section to local educational agencies in the manner, and for the purposes, set forth in this section. This allocation shall be known as the Learning Recovery Emergency Block Grant.

(2) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Evidence-based” has the
 same meaning as that term is used in Section 7801(21)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(B) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(3) The department may collect, from a local educational agency’s principal apportionment monthly payment pursuant to Section 14041, the difference between the local educational agency’s allocation for the Learning Recovery Emergency Block Grant pursuant to this section, as amended by Assembly Bill 185 of the 2021–22 Regular Session, and the revised allocation pursuant to this section, as amended by Senate Bill 114 of the 2023–24 Regular Session. The department shall report any uncollectible amounts to the Department of Finance and the Legislature by January 31, 2024.

(b) Funds described in subdivision (a) shall be
 allocated on a per-unit basis of the local educational agency’s 2021–22 fiscal year second period reported kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, average daily attendance multiplied by the local educational agency’s 2021–22 unduplicated pupil percentage calculated pursuant to Section 2574 or 42238.02, as applicable. Prior fiscal year average daily attendance and unduplicated pupil percentage shall be considered final as of the second principal apportionment for that fiscal year.

(c) (1) The governing board or body of a local educational agency may expend the one-time funds received pursuant to this section to establish learning recovery initiatives through the 2027–28 school year that, at a minimum, support academic learning recovery and staff and pupil social and emotional well-being.

(2) Specifically, funds received under subdivision (b) shall only be
 expended for any of the following purposes:

(A) Instructional learning time for the 2022–23 through 2027–28 school years by increasing the number of instructional days or minutes provided during the school year, providing summer school or intersessional instructional programs, or taking any other evidence-based action that increases or stabilizes the amount of instructional time or services provided to pupils, or decreases or stabilizes staff-to-pupil ratios, based on pupil learning needs.

(B) Accelerating progress to close learning gaps through the implementation, expansion, or enhancement of evidence-based learning supports, such as:

(i) Tutoring or other one-on-one or small group learning supports provided by certificated or classified staff.

(ii) Learning recovery programs and materials designed to accelerate pupil academic proficiency or English language proficiency, or both.

(iii) Providing early intervention and literacy programs for pupils in preschool to grade 3, inclusive, including, but not limited to, school library access.

(iv) Supporting expanded learning opportunity program services pursuant to Section 46120.

(v) Providing instruction and services consistent with the California Community Schools Partnership Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 8900) of Part 6) regardless of grantee status.

(vi) Providing professional development and coaching on either or both of the following:

(I) The 2023 Mathematics
 Framework for California Public Schools: Kindergarten Through Grade Twelve.

(II) The English Language Arts/English Language Development Framework for California Public Schools: Kindergarten Through Grade Twelve.

(C) Integrating evidence-based pupil supports to address other barriers to learning, and staff supports and training, such as the provision of health, counseling, or mental health services, access to school meal programs, before and after school programs, or programs to address pupil trauma and social-emotional learning, or referrals for support for family or pupil needs.

(D) Access to instruction for credit-deficient pupils to complete graduation or grade promotion requirements and to increase or improve pupils’ college eligibility.

(E) Additional academic services for pupils, such as diagnostic, progress monitoring, and benchmark assessments of pupil learning.

(F) Conducting the needs assessment pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) (1) A local educational agency that has received or will receive apportioned funds pursuant to this section shall develop a needs assessment regarding the use and expenditure of funds for the 2025–26, 2026–27, and 2027–28 school years.

(2) The local educational agency shall ensure that the needs assessment:

(A) Identifies pupils in the greatest need of learning recovery supports and the interventions that the local educational agency has selected to address those pupils’ needs pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (c).

(B) Includes a review of each of the following metrics:

(i) Assessment of academic performance in English language arts and mathematics, including, at least:

(I) Across schoolsites, as applicable, and at the local educational agency level based on the performance of pupil groups identified in the “Very Low” or “Low” status levels on the California School Dashboard.

(II) All pupils within the local educational agency whose scale score places them in the lowest achievement level or on the low end of the second lowest achievement level.

(ii) Assessment of chronic absenteeism, including at least:

(I) Across schoolsites, as
 applicable, and at the local educational agency level based on the performance of pupil groups identified in the “Very High” or “High” status levels on the California School Dashboard or, for high schools, at comparatively low levels of performance based on reports on the department’s internet website.

(II) All pupils reported as chronically absent. Local educational agencies are encouraged to conduct further analysis focused on pupils who have high rates of unexcused absences.

(3) A local educational agency may include local metrics as part of the needs assessment that identify pupils who have experienced learning loss or low academic performance, such as formative or interim assessments or similar tools, or evidence of disengagement from school, such as current-year absenteeism data or any metrics the local educational agency uses to identify pupils in need of reengagement
 services.

(4) The department shall provide written technical assistance for schools and local educational agencies that describes how to use local metrics in conjunction with the metrics required pursuant to paragraph (2).

(5) A local educational agency may contract with a third party to develop or otherwise support the development of the needs assessment.

(6) A local educational agency is encouraged to contract, or otherwise partner with, community-based organizations with a track record of success in serving high-needs pupils to deliver the services or programs authorized by this section.

(7) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department provide assistance to local educational agencies by providing information, including data reports,
 necessary to facilitate and assist the local educational agency’s development of the needs assessment pursuant to this subdivision and integration of the needs assessments conducted pursuant to the Literacy Coaches and Reading Specialists Grant Program established pursuant to Section 137 of Chapter 52 of the Statutes of 2022 and the California Community Schools Partnership Act (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 8900) of Part 6) in planning pursuant to this section.

(e) (1) Local educational agencies receiving apportionments pursuant to this section shall report to the department, using the template developed by the department, and make publicly available on their internet websites, interim expenditures of those apportioned funds to the department by December 15, 2024.

(2) If a charter school ceases to operate before December 15, 2029, a final expenditure
 report, using the template developed by the department, shall be due to the department within 60 days of the effective date of closure and the department shall collect any unspent amounts.

(3) (A) The department, on or before June 30, 2023, shall develop an expenditure report template for use by local educational agencies in fulfilling the requirements of paragraph (1).

(B) The template shall require the inclusion of the total expenditures, by fiscal year, for each allowable use pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), disaggregated by each allowable use specified in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(C) The template shall, to the greatest extent practicable, use language that is understandable and accessible to parents.

(f) (1) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, five billion six hundred twenty-five million six hundred forty-eight thousand dollars ($5,625,648,000) of the appropriation made by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2021–22 fiscal year.

(2) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, seven hundred nineteen million seven hundred
 fifty-seven thousand dollars ($719,757,000) of the appropriation made by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2022–23 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2022–23 fiscal year.

(g) (1) For the 2025–26 fiscal year, the sum of three hundred seventy-eight million six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($378,650,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for transfer to the Learning Recovery Emergency Fund created in Section 32525, to be allocated by the Superintendent to local educational agencies operating in the 2025–26 fiscal year pursuant to the methodology specified in subdivision (b).

(2) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California
 Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(h) (1) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of seven hundred fifty-seven million three hundred thousand dollars ($757,300,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for transfer to the Learning Recovery Emergency Fund created in Section 32525, to be allocated by the Superintendent to
 local educational agencies operating in the 2026–27 fiscal year pursuant to the methodology specified in subdivision (b).

(2) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2024–25 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202 of the Education Code, for the 2024–25 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 37.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

32527.
